Wisconsin, session 2025, AB158.
do enact as follows:AB158,11Section 1. 102.17 (9) (a) 1. of the statutes is renumbered 102.17 (9) (a) 1m. 2and amended to read:AB158,3,23102.17 (9) (a) 1m. “Fire fighter” “Firefighter” means any person employed on 4a full-time basis by the state or any political subdivision as a member or officer of a 1fire department, including the 1st class cities and state fire marshal and deputies 2or an individual who volunteers as a member or officer of such a department.AB158,23Section 2. 102.17 (9) (a) 1c. of the statutes is created to read:AB158,3,54102.17 (9) (a) 1c. “Correctional officer” has the meaning given in s. 102.475 (8) 5(a).AB158,36Section 3. 102.17 (9) (a) 1e. of the statutes is created to read:AB158,3,87102.17 (9) (a) 1e. “Emergency medical responder” has the meaning given in s. 8256.01 (4p).AB158,49Section 4. 102.17 (9) (a) 1g. of the statutes is created to read:AB158,3,1110102.17 (9) (a) 1g. “Emergency medical services practitioner” has the meaning 11given in s. 256.01 (5).AB158,512Section 5. 102.17 (9) (a) 1p. of the statutes is created to read:AB158,3,1813102.17 (9) (a) 1p. “Medicolegal investigation staff member” includes a chief 14deputy coroner, a deputy coroner, a deputy medical examiner, and any individual 15who assists the office of a coroner or medical examiner with an investigation of a 16death. “Medicolegal investigation staff member” does not include an individual 17performing solely administrative functions in the office of a coroner or medical 18examiner.AB158,619Section 6. 102.17 (9) (b) (intro.) of the statutes is amended to read:AB158,4,420102.17 (9) (b) (intro.) Subject to par. (c), in the case of a mental injury that is 21not accompanied by a physical injury and that results in a diagnosis of post-22traumatic stress disorder in a law enforcement officer, as defined in s. 23.33 (1) (ig), 23an emergency medical responder, an emergency services practitioner, a correctional 1officer, a public safety answering point dispatcher, a coroner, a medical examiner, a 2medicolegal investigation staff member, or a fire fighter firefighter, the claim for 3compensation for the mental injury, in order to be compensable under this chapter, 4is subject to all of the following:AB158,75Section 7. Nonstatutory provisions.AB158,4,106(1) Worker’s compensation insurance; rate approval; notice. The 7commissioner of insurance shall submit to the legislative reference bureau for 8publication in the Wisconsin Administrative Register a notice of the effective date of 9new rates for worker’s compensation insurance first approved by the commissioner 10after the effective date of this subsection.AB158,811Section 8. Initial applicability.AB158,4,1512(1) The treatment of s. 102.17 (9) (a) 1., 1c., 1e., 1g., and 1p. and (b) (intro.) 13first applies to injuries reported on the effective date of rate changes for worker’s 14compensation insurance approved by the commissioner of insurance under s. 626.13 15after the effective date of this subsection.AB158,4,1616